Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 3. Soil and Water Conservation Districts.

§ 10.1-506.
Power to create new districts and to relocate or define district boundaries; composition of districts.

The Board shall have the power to (i) create a new district from territory not previously within an existing district, (ii) merge or divide existing districts, (iii) transfer territory from an existing district to another district, (iv) modify or create a district by a combination of the above and (v) relocate or define the boundaries of soil and water conservation districts in the manner hereinafter prescribed.

An incorporated town within any county having a soil and water conservation district shall be a part of that district. If a town lies within the boundaries of more than one county, it shall be considered to be wholly within the county in which the larger portion of the town lies.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-2; 1956, c. 654; 1970, c. 480, § 21-12.1; 1988, c. 891.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, cl. 12 provides: “That the Directors of the Departments of Environmental Quality and Conservation and Recreation, the Commissioner of Agriculture and Consumer Services, and members of the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources and the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources, appointed by their respective Chairs, shall convene public meetings throughout the Commonwealth to evaluate the role of soil and water conservation districts in providing effective delivery of water quality services and technical assistance. In their deliberations the representatives of the executive branch agencies and legislators shall:

“A. Discuss the provisions of this act and its implications and solicit comments from the public and affected parties;

“B. Determine the extent of the role soil and water conservation districts should play in providing assistance in delivery of water quality services for nonpoint source pollution management and providing technical assistance for such programs as erosion and sediment control and stormwater management; and

“C. Determine whether the mission of soil and water conservation districts is more effectively delivered under the current statutory framework or whether organizational changes would enhance the effectiveness and efficiency of the delivery of such services.”

§ 10.1-507.
Petitions filed with the Board.

Petitions to modify or create districts, or relocate or define boundaries of existing districts, shall be initiated and filed with the Board for its approval or disapproval by any of the following methods:

By petition of a majority of the directors of any or each district or by petition from a majority of the governing body of any or each county or city.

By petition of a majority of the governing body of a county or city not within an existing district, requesting to be included in an existing district and concurred in by the district directors.

By petition of a majority of the governing body of a county or city or parts thereof not included within an existing district, requesting that a new district be created.

By petition, signed by a number of registered voters equal to twenty-five percent of the vote cast in the last general election, who are residents of a county or city not included within an existing district, requesting that a new district be created, or requesting to be included within an existing district. If the petition bears the signatures of the requisite number of registered voters of a county or city, or two or more cities, then the petition shall be deemed to be the joint petition of the particular combination of political subdivisions named in the petition. If the petition deals in whole or in part with a portion or portions of a political subdivision or subdivisions, then the number of signatures necessary for each portion of a political subdivision shall be the same as if the whole political subdivision were involved in the petition, and may come from the political subdivision at large.

History.

1970, c. 480, § 21-12.2; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-508.
Contents and form of petition.

The petition shall set forth:

The proposed name of the district;

That there is need, in the interest of the public health, safety, and welfare, for the proposed district to function in the territory described in the petition, and a brief statement of the grounds upon which this conclusion is based;

A description of the territory proposed to be organized as a district, which description shall not be required to be given by metes and bounds or by legal subdivision, but shall be deemed sufficient if generally accurate;

A request that the Board define the boundaries for such district; that a hearing be held within the territory so defined on the question of the creation of a district in such territory; and that the Board determine that such a district be created.

Where more than one petition is filed covering parts of the same territory, the Board may consolidate the petitions.

The Board shall prescribe the petition form.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-13; 1964, c. 512; 1970, c. 480; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-509.
Disapproval of petition.

If the Board disapproves the petition, its determination shall be recorded, and if the petitioners are the governing body of a district, county or city or a part of a county or city, the governing body shall be notified in writing. If the petitioners are the requisite number of registered voters prescribed by subdivision 4 of §

10.1-507

, notification shall be by a notice printed once in a newspaper of general circulation within the area designated in the petition.

History.

1970, c. 480, § 21-13.1; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-510.
Petition approved; Board to give notice of hearing.

If the Board approves the petition, within sixty days after such determination, the Board shall provide due notice of the approval in a newspaper of general circulation in each county or city involved. The notice shall include notice of a hearing upon the question of the desirability and necessity, in the interest of the public health, safety, and welfare, of the action proposed by the petition upon (i) the question of the appropriate boundaries to be assigned to such district, (ii) the propriety of the petition and other proceedings taken under this chapter, and (iii) all questions relevant to such inquiries.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-14; 1964, c. 512; 1970, c. 480; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-511.
Adjournment of hearing when additional territory appears desirable.

If it appears upon the hearing that it may be desirable to include within the proposed district territory outside of the area within which due notice of the hearing has been given, the hearing shall be adjourned and due notice of a further hearing shall be given throughout the entire area considered for inclusion in the district.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-16; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-512.
Determination of need for district.

After a public hearing, if the Board determines that there is need, in the interest of the public health, safety, and welfare, for the proposed district to function in the territory considered at the hearing, it shall record its determination, and shall define, by metes and bounds or by legal subdivisions the boundaries of the district. In so doing, the Board shall consider (i) the topography of the area considered and of the Commonwealth, (ii) the composition of soils in the area, (iii) the distribution of erosion, (iv) the prevailing land-use practices, (v) the desirability and necessity of including within the boundaries the particular lands under consideration and the benefits the lands may receive from being included within such boundaries, (vi) the relation of the proposed area to existing watersheds and to other soil and water conservation districts already organized or proposed for organization, (vii) the existing political subdivisions, and (viii) other relevant physical, geographical, economic, and funding factors. The territory to be included within such boundaries need not be contiguous.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-17; 1964, c. 512; 1970, c. 480; 1988, c. 891; 2002, c. 192.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 192 substituted “geographical, economic, and funding factors” for “geographical, and economic factors” at the end of the next-to-last sentence.

§ 10.1-513.
Determination that district not needed.

If the Board determines after the hearing, and after due consideration of the relevant facts, that there is no need for a soil and water conservation district to function in the territory considered at the hearing, it shall record its determination and deny the petition.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-18; 1964, c. 512; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-514.
Determination of feasibility of operation.

After the Board has made and recorded a determination that there is need for the organization of the proposed district in a particular territory, and has defined the boundaries, it shall consider whether the operation of a district within such boundaries is administratively practicable and feasible. In making its determination, the Board shall consider the attitudes of the occupiers of lands lying within the defined boundaries, the probable expense of the operation of such district, the effect upon the programs of any existing districts, and other relevant economic and social factors. If the Board determines that the operation of a district is administratively practicable and feasible, it shall record its determination and proceed with the organization of the district. If the Board determines that the operation of a district is not administratively practicable and feasible, it shall record its determination and deny the petition. If the petition is denied, the Board shall notify the petitioner in the manner provided in this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-20; 1964, c. 512; 1970, c. 480; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-515.
Composition of governing body.

If the Board determines that the operation of the proposed district within the defined boundaries is administratively practicable and feasible, and the proposed district is created, then its governing body shall be a board of district directors appointed or elected in the number and manner specified as follows:

If the district embraces one county or city, or less than one county or city, the board of district directors shall consist of five members, three to be elected by the registered voters of the district and two appointed by the Board.

If the district embraces more than one county or city, or parts thereof, the board of district directors shall consist of two members elected by the registered voters from each county or city, or parts thereof embraced by the district. Two members-at-large shall be appointed by the Board.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-27; 1964, c. 512; 1970, c. 480; 1978, c. 763; 1988, c. 891; 2002, cc. 143, 236.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 143 and 236, effective March 22, 2002, are identical, and deleted “and may include members of the governing body of a local government” following “appointed or elected” in the first paragraph.

§ 10.1-516.
Status of district directors in event of transfer, merger, or division of districts.

In the event of the transfer, merger, or division of districts, the status of the district directors involved shall be affected as follows:

The composition of an existing district board of a district to which territory is transferred shall remain in effect until the terms of office of the present elected members expire. Upon the transfer of a county or city, or parts thereof, from one district to another district, (i) elected district directors residing within the territory transferred shall be appointed as directors of the district to which the territory is transferred for a term of office to coincide with that of the elected directors of the district to which the territory is transferred; and (ii) appointed district directors residing within the territory transferred shall be appointed as directors of the district to which the territory is transferred for a term of office to coincide with that of the appointed directors, either as an extension agent appointee or an at-large appointee of the district to which the territory is transferred. At the option of the petitioners, a petition may request that a proposed transfer be treated as a merger or division for the purpose of this section, and the Board at its discretion may grant or refuse such request.

Upon the merger of existing districts, or upon the separation from two or more existing districts of a county or city, or parts thereof, which merge to create a new district, all district directors residing within the territory merged shall be appointed as directors of the new district. Following the merger, (i) elected district directors residing within the territory of the new district shall be appointed as directors of the new district for a term of office to coincide with that of elected directors as provided in §

10.1-529

; and (ii) appointed district directors residing within the new district shall be appointed as directors of the new district for a term of office to coincide with that of the appointed directors, either as an extension agent appointee or an at-large appointee of the district as provided in §

10.1-529

.

Upon the division of an existing district, to create a new district, all elected or appointed district directors residing within the territory to be divided from the existing district shall be appointed as directors of the new district. Following the division, (i) elected district directors residing within the territory of the new district shall be appointed as directors of the new district for a term of office to coincide with that of elected directors as provided in §

10.1-529

; and (ii) appointed district directors residing within the territory of the new district shall be appointed as directors of the new district for a term of office to coincide with that of the appointed directors, either as an extension agent appointee or an at-large appointee of the district as provided in §

10.1-529

.This section shall not be construed as broadening or limiting the size of a governing body of a district as prescribed by §

10.1-515

. If the operation of this section results in a governing body larger or smaller than the appropriate size permitted by §

10.1-515

, then such a variation, if not otherwise corrected by operation of this section, shall be cured by appropriate appointments by the Board and with the next general election after the transfer, merger, or division in which all those elected directors prescribed by §

10.1-515

may be elected.

History.

1970, c. 480, § 21-27.2; 1988, c. 891; 2002, cc. 143, 236.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 143 and 236, effective March 22, 2002, are identical, and inserted “elected” preceding “district directors” in clause (i) of the first sentence of subdivision 1; added clause (ii) of that sentence; rewrote subdivision 2; rewrote the first paragraph of subdivision 3; and inserted “by appropriate appointments by the Board and” following “be cured by” in the second paragraph of subdivision 3.

§ 10.1-517.
Application and statement to the Secretary of the Commonwealth.

Upon the creation of a district by any means authorized by this chapter, two district directors appointed by the Board and authorized by the Board to do so, shall present to the Secretary of the Commonwealth an application signed by them, which shall set forth: (i) that a petition for the creation of the district was filed with the Board pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, and that the proceedings specified in this chapter were conducted; (ii) that the application is being filed in order to complete the organization of the district as a political subdivision under this chapter; (iii) that the Board has appointed them as district directors; (iv) the name and official residence of each of the district directors together with a certified copy of the appointments evidencing their right to office; (v) the term of office of each of the district directors; (vi) the proposed name of the district; and (vii) the location of the principal office of the district directors. The application shall be subscribed and sworn to by the two district directors authorized by the Board to make such application before an officer authorized by the laws of the Commonwealth to take and certify oaths. The application shall be accompanied by a certified statement by the Board that the district was created as required by law. The statement shall set forth the boundaries of the district as they have been defined by the Board.

If the creation of a district necessitates the dissolution of an existing district, an application shall be submitted to the Secretary of the Commonwealth, with the application for the district to be created, by the directors of the district to be dissolved, for the discontinuance of such district, contingent upon the creation of the new district. The application for discontinuance, duly verified, shall simply state that the lands encompassed in the district to be dissolved shall be included within the territory of the district created. The application for discontinuance of such district shall be accompanied by a certified statement by the Board that the discontinued district was dissolved as required by law and the new district was created as required by law. The statement shall contain a description of the boundaries of each district dissolved and shall set forth the boundaries of the district created as defined by the Board. The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall issue to the directors of each district a certificate of dissolution and shall record the certificate in an appropriate book of record in his office.

When the boundaries of districts are changed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, the various affected district boards shall each present to the Secretary of the Commonwealth an application, signed by them, for a new certificate of organization evidencing the change of boundaries. The application shall be filed with the Secretary of the Commonwealth accompanied by a certified statement by the Board that the boundaries have been changed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. The statement by the Board shall define the new boundary line in a manner adequate to describe the boundary changes of districts. When the application and statement have been filed with the Secretary of the Commonwealth, the change of boundary shall become effective and the Secretary of the Commonwealth shall issue to the directors of each of the districts a certificate of organization evidencing the change of boundaries.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-28; 1964, c. 512; 1970, c. 480; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-518.
Action of Secretary on the application and statement; change of name of district.

The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall examine the application and statement and, if he finds that the name proposed for the district is not identical to that of any other soil and water conservation district shall receive and file them and shall record the application in an appropriate book of record in his office. If the Secretary of the Commonwealth finds that the name proposed for the district is identical to that of any other soil and water conservation district, or so nearly similar as to lead to confusion and uncertainty, he shall certify such fact to the Board, which shall submit to the Secretary of the Commonwealth a new name for the district. Upon receipt of the new name, the Secretary of the Commonwealth shall record the application, with the name so modified, in an appropriate book of record in his office. When the application and statement have been made, filed and recorded, as herein provided, the district shall constitute a political subdivision of the Commonwealth. The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall make and issue to the directors a certificate, under the lesser seal of the Commonwealth, of the due organization of the district and shall record the certificate with the application and statement. The boundaries of the district shall include the territory as determined by the Board, but shall not include any area included within the boundaries of another district, except in those cases otherwise provided for in this article. The name of any district may be changed if a petition for such change is subscribed by twenty-five or more landowners from each county or city comprising the district and adopted by resolution of the district directors at any regular meeting. The district directors shall submit a copy of the resolution to the Board and, if the Board concurs, it shall present the resolution, together with a certified statement that it concurs, to the Secretary of the Commonwealth who shall file the resolution and issue a new or amended certificate of organization.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-29; 1954, c. 670; 1958, c. 409; 1960, c. 208; 1962, c. 212; 1964, c. 512; 1970, c. 480; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-518.1.
Secretary to send copies of certificates to State Board of Elections.

Whenever the Secretary issues a certificate creating, dissolving, or changing the name or composition of a district, the Secretary shall promptly send a certified copy of such certificate to the State Board of Elections.

History.

2001, c. 53.

§ 10.1-519.
Renewal of petition after disapproval or denial.

After six months have expired from the date of the disapproval or denial of any petition for a soil and water conservation district, subsequent petitions covering the same or substantially the same territory may be filed with the Board as provided in this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-30; 1964, c. 512; 1970, c. 480; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-520.
Contracts to remain in force; succession to rights and obligations.

Upon consummation of any transfer, merger, or division, or any combination thereof, using territory within a previously existing district to form a new district or to add to an existing district, all contracts in effect at the time of the consummation, affecting or relating to the territory transferred, merged, or divided, to which the governing body of the district from which such territory was acquired is a party shall remain in force for the period provided in the contracts. Rights and obligations acquired or assumed by the district from which the territory was acquired shall succeed to the district to which the territory is transferred.

History.

1970, c. 480, § 21-31.2; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-521.
Determination of status of district boundaries upon annexation or consolidation.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

10.1-507

, the Board may, in its discretion, relocate or redefine district boundaries on its own motion pending or subsequent to any annexation or consolidation.

If the Board determines on its own motion to relocate or redefine district boundaries, the Board shall serve written notice of its determination, containing the full terms of the proposed relocation or redefinition, on the governing body of each district, county, city and town affected by the relocation or redefinition of boundaries. If within forty-five days from the date of service of such notice each governing body affected approves the Board’s action by resolution of a majority of the members, the Board may then proceed to act on its motion without a public hearing.

History.

1970, c. 480, § 21-31.3; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-522.
Certificate of Secretary of Commonwealth as evidence.

In any suit, action, or proceeding involving the validity or enforcement of, or relating to, any contract, proceeding, or action of the district, the district shall be deemed to have been established, reorganized, or renamed, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter upon proof of the issuance of the certificate by the Secretary of the Commonwealth. A copy of such certificate shall be admissible in evidence in any such suit, action, or proceeding and shall be proof of the issuance and contents thereof.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-32; 1954, c. 670; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-523.
Nominating petitions; posting of notice.

Beginning 30 days after the date of issuance by the Secretary of the Commonwealth of a certificate of organization of a district, but not later than the filing date specified in §

24.2-507

for the November 2003 general election and each fourth year thereafter, nominating petitions, statements of qualifications, and declarations of candidacy shall be filed with the general registrar of the county or city where the candidate resides, pursuant to §§

24.2-501

,

24.2-503

,

24.2-505

,

24.2-506

, and

24.2-507

, to nominate candidates for elected directors of such districts. Nominating petitions, statements of qualifications, and declarations of candidacy for elected directors of existing districts shall be filed with the general registrar of the county or city where the candidate resides, pursuant to §§

24.2-501

,

24.2-503

,

24.2-505

,

24.2-506

, and 24.2-507. Notice of the date for filing such petitions and the time of the election shall be posted in a prominent location accessible to the public at each district office at least 30 days before the filing date. In addition, districts may use newsletters, websites, public service announcements, and other notices to advise the public of elections of district directors.

Registered voters may sign more than one nominating petition to nominate more than one candidate for district director.

The Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board shall notify each district of the requirement (i) to post notice of the dates for filing such petitions and the election and (ii) that the posting shall be in a prominent location accessible to the public at each district office at least 30 days before the filing date.

Beginning in the year 2003, elections shall be held only at the November general election in 2003 and at the November general election in each fourth year thereafter.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 21-33 to 21-36; 1964, c. 512; 1970, c. 480; 1988, c. 891; 2001, c. 53; 2002, cc. 143, 236; 2009, cc. 370, 629.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 53, in subsection A, substituted “Beginning” for “Within,” substituted “the filing date specified in §

24.2-507

, nominating petitions, statements of qualifications, and declarations of candidacy shall be filed with the general registrar of the county or city where the candidate resides, pursuant to §§

24.2-501

,

24.2-503

,

24.2-505

,

24.2-506

, and

24.2-507

” for “a date set by the Board, nominating petitions may be filed with the Board,” inserted “statements of qualifications, and declarations of candidacy,” substituted “general registrar of the county or city where the candidate resides, pursuant to §§

24.2-501

,

24.2-503

,

24.2-505

,

24.2-506

, and 24.2-507” for “Board no later than a date set by the Board,” and deleted the former last sentence, which read: “The Board may extend the time during which nominating petitions may be filed”; deleted former subsection B, which read: “A nominating petition shall not be accepted by the Board, unless it is subscribed by twenty-five or more registered voters residing within the boundaries of the district”; redesignated former subsections C and D as present subsections B and C; and inserted “Virginia Soil and Water Conservation” in present subsection C.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 143 and 236, effective March 22, 2002, are identical, and inserted “for the November 2003 general election and each fourth year thereafter” in the middle of the first sentence of subsection A; deleted “fix the time and” preceding “give due notice” in subsection C; and added subsection D.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 370 and 629 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “posted in a prominent location accessible to the public at each district” for “published in a newspaper of general circulation within the district” and added the last sentence; and substituted “notify each district of the requirement (i) to post notice of the dates for filing such petitions and the election and (ii) that the posting shall be in a prominent location accessible to the public at each district office at least 30 days before the filing date” for “give due notice of an election to be held for the election of district directors” in subsection C; and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 10.1-524.
Names of nominees furnished electoral board; how ballots printed, etc.

The names of all nominees shall be furnished to the secretary of the electoral board of the respective county or city and shall be printed upon ballots. The ballots shall be printed, voted, counted and canvassed in conformity with the provisions of general law relating to elections, except as herein otherwise provided.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-37; 1960, c. 208; 1970, c. 480; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-525.
Canvassing returns.

The result of the election shall be canvassed and certified by the electoral board for the county or city in which the candidate resides pursuant to §§

24.2-671

through

24.2-678

. The State Board of Elections shall, promptly after the meeting required by §

24.2-679

, certify to the Director of the Department of Conservation and Recreation a list of the candidates elected and certified as Directors of Soil and Water Conservation Districts, as reported pursuant to §

24.2-675

.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-38; 1960, c. 208; 1964, c. 512; 1988, c. 891; 2001, c. 53; 2002, cc. 143, 236.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 53 deleted “If the district embraces more than one county or city, either in whole or in part” from the beginning of the first sentence, and in that sentence substituted “and certified by the electoral board for the county or city in which the candidate resides pursuant to §§

24.2-671

through

24.2-678

” for “by the State Board of Elections,” and added the last sentence.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 143 and 236, effective March 22, 2002, are identical, and deleted the former second sentence, which read: “If the election is held at any other time than that fixed for the general election in November, the canvass shall be made as in the case of a special election to fill a vacancy.”

§ 10.1-526.
Persons eligible to vote.

All registered voters residing within each county or city or part thereof shall be eligible to vote in the election for their respective nominees.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-39; 1970, c. 480; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-527.
Determination of candidates elected.

If the district embraces one county or city, or less than one county or city, the three candidates who receive the largest number of the votes cast in the election shall be elected directors for the district.

If the district embraces more than one county or city, or parts thereof, the two candidates from each county or city, or part thereof, receiving the largest number of the votes cast in the election shall be the elected directors for the district.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-40; 1970, c. 480; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-528.
Expenses and publication of results.

The expenses of such elections shall be paid by the counties or cities concerned. The State Board of Elections shall publish, or have published within the district, the results of the election.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-41; 1960, c. 208; 1964, c. 512; 1988, c. 891; 2002, cc. 143, 236.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 143 and 236, effective March 22, 2002, are identical, and deleted the former second sentence, which read: “However, if the election is held at any other time than that fixed for the general election in November, the expenses shall be paid by the Board.”

§ 10.1-529.
District directors constitute governing body; qualifications.

The governing body of the district shall consist of five or more district directors, elected and appointed as provided in this article.

The two district directors appointed by the Board shall be persons who are by training and experience qualified to perform the specialized skilled services which will be required of them in the performance of their duties. One of the appointed district directors shall be the extension agent of the county or city, or one of the counties or cities constituting the district, or a part thereof. Other appointed and elected district directors shall reside within the boundaries of the district.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 21-42, 21-43; 1954, c. 670; 1964, c. 512; 1970, c. 480; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-529.1.
Duties of district directors.

In addition to other duties and powers, district directors shall:

Identify soil and water issues and opportunities within the district or related to the district and establish priorities for addressing these issues;

Seek a comprehensive understanding of the complex issues that impact soil and water, and assist in resolving the identified issues at the watershed, local, regional, state, and national levels;

Engage in actions that will improve soil and water stewardship by use of locally led programs;

Increase understanding among community leaders, including elected officials and others, of their role in soil and water quality protection and improvement;

Foster discussion and advancement within the community of positions and programs by their district;

Actively participate in the activities of the district and ensure district resources are used effectively and managed wisely; and

Support and promote the advancement of districts and their capabilities.

History.

2005, c. 73.

§ 10.1-530.
Designation of chairman; terms of office; filling vacancies.

The district directors shall designate a chairman from the elected members, or from the Board-appointed members, of the district board and may change such designation.

The term of office of each district director shall be four years. A district director shall hold office until his successor has been elected or appointed and has qualified. The selection of successors to fill a full term shall be made in accordance with the provisions of this article. Beginning in the year 2003, the election of district directors shall be held at the November 2003 general election and each fourth year thereafter. The terms of office of elected district directors shall begin on January 1 following the November general election. The term of office of any district director elected in November 1999 shall be extended to the January 1 following the November 2003 general election. The term of office of any district director elected in November 2000 shall expire on the January 1 following the November 2003 general election. The term of office of any district director elected in November 2001 or 2002 shall be extended to expire on the January 1 following the November general election in 2007. Appointments made by the Board to the at-large position held by an extension agent shall be made to commence January 1, 2005, and each fourth year thereafter. Appointments made by the Board to the other at-large position shall be made to commence January 1, 2007, and each fourth year thereafter. Any appointment made by the Board prior to January 1, 2005, to an at-large position held by an extension agent shall be made to expire January 1, 2005; and any appointment made by the Board prior to January 1, 2007, to the other at-large position shall be made to expire January 1, 2007.

A vacancy shall exist in the event of the death, resignation or removal of residence from the district of any director or the elimination or detachment from the district of the territory in which a director resides, or by the removal of a director from office by the Board. Any vacancy in an elected or appointed director’s position shall be filled by an appointment made by the Board for the unexpired term. In the event of the creation of a new district, the transfer of territory from an existing district to an existing district, or the addition of territory not previously within an existing district to an existing district, the Board may appoint directors to fill the vacancies of elected directors prescribed by §

10.1-515

in the newly created district or in the territory added to an existing district. Such appointed directors shall serve in office until the elected directors prescribed by §

10.1-515

take office after the next general election at which directors for the entire district are selected.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 21-44, 21-45; 1954, c. 670; 1956, c. 654; 1964, c. 512; 1970, c. 480; 1988, c. 891; 2001, c. 54; 2002, cc. 143, 236.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 54, in subsection A, deleted a comma following “chairman,” and inserted “from the elected members, or from the Board-appointed members, of the district board.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 143 and 236, effective March 22,2002, are identical, and rewrote subsection B; and in subsection C, inserted “in an elected or appointed director’s position” following “Any vacancy” in the second sentence, and deleted
the former third sentence, which read: “The Board may fill vacancies in elective district directors’ positions by appointment for the unexpired term.”

§ 10.1-531.
Quorum and expenses.

A majority of the district directors currently in office shall constitute a quorum and the concurrence of a majority of those present and voting shall be required for all determinations. A district director shall receive no compensation for his services, but shall be entitled to expenses, including traveling expenses, necessarily incurred in the discharge of his duties.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-46; 1970, c. 480; 1988, c. 891; 2003, c. 616.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 616 inserted “currently in office” in the first sentence.

§ 10.1-532.
Employment of officers, agents and employees.

The district directors may employ a secretary-treasurer, whose qualifications shall be approved by the Board, technical experts, and such other officers, agents and employees, permanent and temporary, as they may require, and shall determine their qualifications, duties and compensation.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-47; 1964, c. 512; 1970, c. 480; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-533.
Delegation of powers.

The district directors may delegate to their chairman or to one or more district directors, agents or employees such powers and duties as they may deem proper.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-48; 1970, c. 480; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-534.
Information furnished Board.

The district directors shall furnish to the Board or Department, upon request, copies of ordinances, rules, regulations, orders, contracts, forms, and other documents that they adopt or employ, and other information concerning their activities as the Board or Department may require in the performance of its duties under this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-49; 1964, c. 512; 1970, c. 480; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-535.
Bonds of officers and employees; records and accounts.

The district directors shall (i) provide for the execution of surety bonds for all employees and officers who shall be entrusted with funds or property; (ii) provide for the keeping of a full and accurate record of all proceedings and of all resolutions, regulations, and orders issued or adopted; and (iii) provide for an annual audit of the accounts of receipts and disbursements by the Auditor of Public Accounts or a certified public accountant approved by him.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-50; 1970, c. 480; 1988, c. 891.